Utah statutes.
16-10a-1408.   Enforcement of claims against dissolved corporations.
A claim may be enforced:
(1)  under Section 16-10a-1406 or 16-10a-1407 against the dissolved
corporation, to the extent of its undistributed assets; or
(2)  against a shareholder of the dissolved corporation, if the assets have
been distributed in liquidation; but a shareholder's total liability for all
claims under this section may not exceed the total value of assets distributed
to him, as that value is determined at the time of distribution.  Any
shareholder required to return any portion of the value of assets received by
him in liquidation shall be entitled to contribution from all other
shareholders.  The contributions shall be in accordance with the shareholders'
respective rights and interests and may not exceed the value of the assets
received in liquidation.
